Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2708.01
Depreciable
repairs or parts for agricultural machinery or equipment; refund of sales
or use taxes; procedure.

(1) Any purchaser of depreciable
repairs or parts for agricultural machinery or equipment used in commercial
agriculture may apply for a refund of all of the Nebraska sales or use taxes
and all of the local option sales or use taxes paid prior to October 1, 2014, on the repairs or
parts.

(2) The purchaser shall file a claim within three years after
the date of purchase with the Tax Commissioner pursuant to section 77-2708.
The information provided on a tax refund claim allowed under this section
may be disclosed to any other tax official of this state.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 181;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 154;

Laws 1992, Fourth Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 29;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 57;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 72;

Laws 2014, LB96, § 4.